Hawaii statutes.
[§487-16] Appointment of receiver; powers;
limitation. (a) If the director initiates any action in circuit court
under this chapter against a person for allegedly engaging in unfair or
deceptive acts or practices in violation of section 480-2, the court may
appoint a receiver for the assets of such person upon application by the
director and proof submitted at a hearing on the application which is
sufficient to establish that:

(1) The person previously engaged in a pattern of
unfair or deceptive acts or practices which resulted in substantial actual
damages to consumers;

(2) The person is outside the State or is actually
removing or about to remove self or property outside the State or is concealing
self or property; or

(3) The appointment of a receiver is necessary to
preserve the assets of the person for the benefit of consumers allegedly
damaged by the person's unfair or deceptive acts or practices.

(b) Subject to the limitation in subsection
(c), a receiver appointed by the court pursuant to subsection (a) may sue for,
collect, receive, and take into possession all the goods and chattels, rights,
credits, moneys, effects, lands, tenements, books, records, documents, papers,
choses in action, bills, notes, and property of every description, including
property with which such property has been commingled, which is owned by or
owing to the defendant. The receiver may sell, convey, or assign the property
and hold or dispose of the proceeds thereof subject to the approval of the
court.

(c) Prior to the judgment, the receiver shall
exercise such powers enumerated in subsection (b) as may be necessary to
preserve the assets of the defendant pending the judgment. [L 1983, c 35, §1]

Rules of Court

Receivers, see HRCP rule 66.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next